Idaho, session 2025, S1161.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Office of Species Conservation $30,000
from the Miscellaneous Revenue Fund, to be expended for operating expendi-
tures, for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.